District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-204

Formation in general.

(a)

A lease contract may be made in any manner sufficient to show agreement, including conduct by both parties which recognizes the existence of a lease contract.

(b)

An agreement sufficient to constitute a lease contract may be found although the moment of its making is undetermined.

(c)

Although one or more terms are left open, a lease contract does not fail for indefiniteness if the parties have intended to make a lease contract and there is a reasonably certain basis for giving an appropriate remedy.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-204.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-204.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Agreement”. Section 1-201(3).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Party”. Section 1-201(29).

“Remedy”. Section 1-201(34).

“Term”. Section 1-201(42).